Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-520
County sheriff; terms; qualifications; partisan ballot.

Except as provided in section 23-1701, a county sheriff shall be elected in each county at the statewide general election in 1990 and each four years thereafter. The term of the county sheriff shall be four years or until his or her successor is elected and qualified. The county sheriff shall meet the qualifications found in sections 23-1701 and 23-1701.01. The county sheriff shall be elected on the partisan ballot.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 116;

Laws 2024, LB894, § 3.